Maryland, session 2026, HB0317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
5–108.
IF A PERSON IS REQUIRED TO FILE AN ANNUAL CERTIFICATION UNDER § 17–1001
OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, THE PERSON IS NOT ELIGIBLE
TO RECEIVE PAYMENT OF A STATE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT GRANT, LOAN, LOAN
GUARANTEE, OR TAX CREDIT IN A FISCAL YEAR UNTIL THE PERSON HAS FILED THE
ANNUAL CERTIFICATION APPLICABLE FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
SUBTITLE 10. CERTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE WITH LABOR LAWS.
17–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADMINISTERING AGENCY” MEANS A STATE AGENCY OR UNIT THAT
ADMINISTERS:
(1) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE; OR
(2) A STATE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT.
(C) “COVERED OBLIGATIONS” MEANS, TO THE EXTENT APPLICABLE TO A
COVERED RECIPIENT’S OPERATIONS IN THE STATE, REQUIREMENTS UNDER TITLE 3,
SUBTITLES 2, 3, 4, 5, 8, AND 9 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE.
(D) “COVERED RECIPIENT” MEANS A PERSON THAT, IN THE PRECEDING
FISCAL YEAR:
(1) RECEIVED $100,000 OR MORE IN ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ASSISTANCE; OR
(2) HELD AGGREGATE STATE PROCUREMENT CONTRACTS OF $250,000
OR MORE.

HOUSE BILL 317 3
(E) “ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE” MEANS ANY STATE PROGRAM
THAT PROVIDES BUSINESS OR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SUPPORT, INCLUDING
GRANTS, LOANS, LOAN GUARANTEES, OR TAX CREDITS.
(F) “FINAL ADVERSE DETERMINATION” MEANS:
(1) A FINAL NONAPPEALABLE COURT JUDGMENT OR ADMINISTRATIVE
ORDER FINDING A VIOLATION OF A COVERED OBLIGATION; OR
(2) A SETTLEMENT THAT INCLUDES AN ADMISSION OR STIPULATED
FINDING OF A VIOLATION OF A COVERED OBLIGATION.
(G) “PAUSE” MEANS A TEMPORARY INELIGIBILITY OF A COVERED RECIPIENT
TO RECEIVE:
(1) NEW DISBURSEMENTS OF PREVIOUSLY APPROVED STATE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE;
(2) NEW APPROVALS OF STATE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ASSISTANCE; OR
(3) NEW CONTRACT AWARDS OR RENEWALS OF EXISTING CONTRACTS.
17–1002.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR BEGINNING IN 2027, EACH
COVERED RECIPIENT SHALL FILE WITH THE ADMINISTERING AGENCY A
CERTIFICATION SIGNED BY AN AUTHORIZED OFFICER STATING THAT, TO THE
SIGNER’S KNOWLEDGE AFTER REASONABLE INQUIRY, DURING THE YEAR PRECEDING
THE CERTIFICATION DATE, THE COVERED RECIPIENT:
(I) WAS NOT THE SUBJECT OF A FINAL ADVERSE
DETERMINATION CONCERNING A COVERED OBLIGATION; AND
(II) IS NOT CURRENTLY FAILING TO COMPLY WITH ANY
OUTSTANDING REQUIREMENT UNDER A PRIOR FINAL JUDGMENT OR ORDER
CONCERNING A COVERED OBLIGATION.
(2) A CERTIFICATION MAY BE SUBMITTED ELECTRONICALLY
THROUGH A STATE VENDOR OR INCENTIVE PORTAL DESIGNATED BY THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS OR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE.

HOUSE BILL 317
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF A
COVERED RECIPIENT DOES NOT FILE THE CERTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION THE ADMINISTERING AGENCY SHALL SEND
WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE COVERED RECIPIENT THAT THE COVERED RECIPIENT HAS
30 DAYS TO COMPLY WITH THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT.
(2) IF A COVERED RECIPIENT DOES NOT FILE THE CERTIFICATION
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE IS SENT, THE ADMINISTERING AGENCY SHALL
INITIATE A PAUSE OF THE COVERED RECIPIENT TO REMAIN IN EFFECT UNTIL:
(I) THE CERTIFICATION IS FILED; AND
(II) IF THE COVERED RECIPIENT WAS UNABLE TO MAKE THE
CERTIFICATION DUE TO THE FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH A FINAL ADVERSE
DETERMINATION, PRIOR FINAL JUDGMENT, OR ORDER CONCERNING A COVERED
OBLIGATION, THE LATER OF:
1. 12 MONTHS AFTER THE DATE OF THE MOST RECENT
FINAL ADVERSE DETERMINATION; OR
2. THE COVERED RECIPIENT’S COMPLETION OF ALL
CORRECTIVE ACTIONS AND PAYMENTS REQUIRED BY THE PRIOR FINAL ADVERSE
DETERMINATION OR ORDER.
(C) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES:
(1) A COVERED RECIPIENT TO REIMBURSE ANY FUNDS PREVIOUSLY
RECEIVED; OR
(2) THE TERMINATION OF EXISTING CONTRACTS.
(D) AN AGENCY MAY NOT INITIATE A PAUSE DUE TO A FINAL ADVERSE
DETERMINATION IF:
(1) TOTAL MONETARY RELIEF, INCLUDING WAGES, PENALTIES, AND
CONTRIBUTIONS, IS LESS THAN $5,000;
(2) THERE IS NO FINDING OF WILLFULNESS, CHILD LABOR, OR
MISCLASSIFICATION; AND
(3) THE RECIPIENT PAID THE MONETARY RELIEF IN FULL WITHIN 30
DAYS AFTER THE DETERMINATION.

HOUSE BILL 317 5
(E) A WILLFULLY FALSE CERTIFICATION MAY:
(1) BE REFERRED TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER
THE MARYLAND FALSE CLAIMS ACT; AND
(2) CONSTITUTE GROUNDS FOR SUSPENSION OR DEBARMENT UNDER
TITLE 16 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) A PAUSE UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED TO BE A
PENALTY.
(G) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT CREATE A NEW AUDIT PROGRAM.
(2) THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS MAY ADOPT A SINGLE–QUESTION
MODEL CERTIFICATION FORM AND INTEGRATE FILING INTO EXISTING PORTALS.
(H) AN ADMINISTERING AGENCY MAY PUBLISH A LIST INDICATING WHICH
COVERED RECIPIENTS:
(1) HAVE COMPLIED WITH THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT; OR
(2) ARE PAUSED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.